Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 343.407 is amended to read:
343.407. School districts shall identify talented  and gifted [ students] children enrolled in public
schools under rules adopted by the State Board of Education.  The rules must  require school
districts to:
(1) Allow any person who knows the  child to recommend that a child be screened for
identification as a talented and gifted child;
(2) Provide a screening of a child recommended under subsection (1) of this section;
(3) Accept recommendations under subsection (1) of this section throughout the school
year;
(4) Directly inform parents  of the process to recommend that a child be screened for
identification as a talented and gifted child; and
(5) Provide information on the school district’s website about the process to recommend
that a child be screened for identification as a talented and gifted child.
Enrolled Senate Bill 934 (SB 934-A) Page 1
Passed by Senate March 17, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House May 27, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 934 (SB 934-A) Page 2